Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-156
Joint city and school district facility; acquisition of land; erection, equipment, furnishings, and maintenance.

Any school district in this state which has within its boundaries, or is contiguous to, a city of the second class may, together with such city, jointly acquire land for, erect, equip, furnish, maintain, and operate a joint municipal and recreation building or joint recreational and athletic field to be used jointly by such school district and city.

Laws 1953, c. 37, § 1, p. 128;

Laws 1955, c. 39, § 1, p. 152;

Laws 1961, c. 47, § 1, p. 184.